Connecticut, session 2026, HB05271.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. (Effective July 1, 2026) For the fiscal year ending June 30,
2 2027, the Office of the Child Advocate shall hire one or more full-time
3 employees to assist in the evaluation of the delivery of services to
4 children by state agencies and those entities that provide services to
5 children through funds provided by the state.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 July 1, 2026 New section
KID Joint Favorable Subst. C/R APP
LCO 1 of 1